New Jersey, session 222, A4847.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. There is established in the Department of the Treasury a nonlapsing, revolving emergency fund to prevent the closure of child care programs resulting from decreases in enrollment.  This fund shall be the repository for monies appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act and any available federal funding sources, such as the Child Care and Development Block Grant of 1990, Pub.L.97-35 (42 U.S.C. s.9857 et seq.).  The State Treasurer shall be the custodian of the fund and all disbursements from the fund shall be made by the State Treasurer upon requests made by the Commissioner of Human Services.  The monies in the fund shall be invested and reinvested by the Director of the Division of Investment in the Department of the Treasury in the same manner as other trust funds in the custody of the State Treasurer, in the manner provided by law.  Interest received on the monies in the fund shall be credited to the fund. b.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall develop an application process for the distribution of monies from the fund to the owners of child care programs licensed pursuant to P.L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B-1 et seq.), or family day care providers registered pursuant to P.L.1987, c.27 (C.30:5B-16 et seq.), by the Department of Children and Families that are at risk of closure and document an enrollment decrease of 30 percent or more from the previous calendar year. c.     Monies from the fund shall be disbursed annually to owners of licensed or registered child care programs with approved applications for assistance, pursuant to subsection b. of this section, on a rolling basis until the fund is depleted.  A grant shall not exceed $60,000 to any one entity in a calendar year. d.    The Commissioner of Human Services may impose any additional application requirements on the owners of licensed or registered child care programs who receive grant monies from a federal funding source as necessary for compliance with applicable federal and State law. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Human Services the sum of $10,000,000 to be credited to the fund established pursuant to section 1 of this act to effectuate the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately; however, it shall remain inoperative until funds are deposited into the emergency fund, and the Commissioner of Human Services may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of the act.